District of Columbia statutes.
47-1808.03a

Repealed

Tax on unincorporated businesses — Transfer of surtax to Convention Center Authority.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 331, ch. 258, art. I, title VIII, § 3a
as added Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 301(b)(2), 41 DCR 5333
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142,§ 3(a), 45 DCR 4826
Washington Convention Center Authority, collection and allocation of taxes under this section, see § 10-1203.07.
1981 Ed., § 47-1808.3a.

Expiration of §§ 301, 302 and 303 of D.C. Law 10-188: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-1807.02a.

Audit of accounts and operation of Authority: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-1807.02a.